Louisiana, session 2026, SB509.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:901(C)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§901. Insurable interest required; personal insurance; intentional acts exclusion
* * *
C. "Insurable interest" as used in this Section and in R.S. 22:856 includes
only interest as follows:
* * *
(2)(a) In the case of other persons, a lawful and substantial economic interest
in having the life, health or bodily safety of the individual insured continue, as
distinguished from an interest which would arise only by, or would be enhanced in
value by, the death, disablement or injury of the individual insured.
(b)(i) A bank shall be deemed to maintain its insurable interest in a
former employee for the purposes of exchanging one bank-owned life insurance
policy for another.
(b)(ii) The commissioner shall determine the method and manner in
which a bank may obtain consent for the exchange. In making such a
determination, the commissioner shall consider whether the life insurance
policy is funding benefits afforded to the bank's employees, applicable consent
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 509 ENROLLED
requirements, if any, under existing law, cybersecurity controls, alignment with
federal and interstate requirements, and the continuity of coverage in
connection with policy exchanges.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.